Utah statutes.
9-7-505.   Rules -- Use of library.

(1)  The board shall make library rules in a manner consistent with county ordinances, policies, and procedures for the governing of the library.

(2)  Each library established under this part shall be free to the use of the inhabitants of the area taxed for the support of the library, subject to the rules made as prescribed by county ordinance.

